src/nlpia/data/words_libre_office_names_us.aff
FLAG num
SFX 952 Y 1
SFX 952 0 die's .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 l's .
SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23 0 on .
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 0 op .
SFX 546 Y 1
SFX 546 0 or .
SFX 797 Y 1
SFX 797 0 ot .
SFX 413 Y 1
SFX 413 0 ow .
SFX 994 Y 1
SFX 994 0 yce's .
SFX 559 Y 1
SFX 559 0 ng's .
SFX 347 Y 1
SFX 347 0 ndra's .
SFX 82 Y 1
SFX 82 0 ita's .
SFX 909 Y 1
SFX 909 0 inda .
SFX 784 Y 1
SFX 784 0 rell .
SFX 457 Y 1
SFX 457 0 han's .
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 0 ie's .
SFX 758 Y 1
SFX 758 0 ryl's .
SFX 207 Y 1
SFX 207 0 ney's .
SFX 835 Y 1
SFX 835 e mer e
SFX 881 Y 1
SFX 881 i ki i
SFX 418 Y 1
SFX 418 a nda's a
SFX 573 Y 1
SFX 573 l mer l
SFX 563 Y 1
SFX 563 e nda's e
SFX 160 Y 1
SFX 160 a ine's a
SFX 966 Y 1
SFX 966 a ca's a
SFX 368 Y 1
SFX 368 e ine's e
SFX 374 Y 1
SFX 374 a etta's a
SFX 530 Y 1
SFX 530 n rley n
SFX 615 Y 1
SFX 615 a iko's a
SFX 588 Y 1
SFX 588 i li i
SFX 311 Y 1
SFX 311 a ee's a
SFX 742 Y 1
SFX 742 n sman n
SFX 561 Y 1
SFX 561 m ndra's m
SFX 322 Y 1
SFX 322 a ton's a
SFX 769 Y 1
SFX 769 n rlene n
SFX 494 Y 1
SFX 494 e ton's e
SFX 585 Y 1
SFX 585 a line's a
SFX 711 Y 1
SFX 711 h ton's h
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 a on's a
SFX 162 Y 1
SFX 162 a er's a
SFX 964 Y 1
SFX 964 a cia's a
SFX 710 Y 1
SFX 710 k ton's k
SFX 493 Y 1
SFX 493 l ton's l
SFX 287 Y 1
SFX 287 e on's e
SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 a ton a
SFX 728 Y 1
SFX 728 l ter's l
SFX 584 Y 1
SFX 584 i line's i
SFX 709 Y 1
SFX 709 n ton's n
SFX 501 Y 1
SFX 501 n ter's n
SFX 806 Y 1
SFX 806 h on's h
SFX 414 Y 1
SFX 414 i on's i
SFX 496 Y 1
SFX 496 e ton e
SFX 645 Y 1
SFX 645 a dall's a
SFX 547 Y 1
SFX 547 l on's l
SFX 714 Y 1
SFX 714 h ton h
SFX 713 Y 1
SFX 713 k ton k
SFX 495 Y 1
SFX 495 l ton l
SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 a ita's a
SFX 712 Y 1
SFX 712 n ton n
SFX 754 Y 1
SFX 754 n sette's n
SFX 723 Y 1
SFX 723 e ther's e
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 e ita's e
SFX 409 Y 1
SFX 409 i ri i
SFX 591 Y 1
SFX 591 a ley's a
SFX 535 Y 1
SFX 535 m ri m
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 n ri n
SFX 772 Y 1
SFX 772 a ris's a
SFX 213 Y 1
SFX 213 e ley's e
SFX 392 Y 1
SFX 392 n ssie's n
SFX 440 Y 1
SFX 440 i ley's i
SFX 901 Y 1
SFX 901 a ise a
SFX 587 Y 1
SFX 587 a line a
SFX 406 Y 1
SFX 406 n ris's n
SFX 359 Y 1
SFX 359 e land's e
SFX 586 Y 1
SFX 586 i line i
SFX 932 Y 1
SFX 932 a esa's a
SFX 627 Y 1
SFX 627 a ford's a
SFX 922 Y 1
SFX 922 e ford's e
SFX 761 Y 1
SFX 761 n rtha n
SFX 614 Y 1
SFX 614 a ing a
SFX 871 Y 1
SFX 871 d lcock d
SFX 523 Y 1
SFX 523 n rt's n
SFX 646 Y 1
SFX 646 a dall a
SFX 855 Y 1
SFX 855 i lia's i
SFX 689 Y 1
SFX 689 i vin's i
SFX 533 Y 1
SFX 533 i rine's i
SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 n rd's n
SFX 601 Y 1
SFX 601 d ks's d
SFX 476 Y 1
SFX 476 a by a
SFX 737 Y 1
SFX 737 n ssell n
SFX 499 Y 1
SFX 499 e th's e
SFX 699 Y 1
SFX 699 n ugh's n
SFX 894 Y 1
SFX 894 a issa's a
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 n rd n
SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 a er a
SFX 405 Y 1
SFX 405 n rrie n
SFX 721 Y 1
SFX 721 n th's n
SFX 491 Y 1
SFX 491 n tton n
SFX 521 Y 1
SFX 521 i ry's i
SFX 746 Y 1
SFX 746 i sie's i
SFX 736 Y 1
SFX 736 n ssell's n
SFX 400 Y 1
SFX 400 n ry's n
SFX 515 Y 1
SFX 515 n sie's n
SFX 943 Y 1
SFX 943 a ela a
SFX 408 Y 1
SFX 408 i ri's i
SFX 531 Y 1
SFX 531 m ri's m
SFX 336 Y 1
SFX 336 n ri's n
SFX 613 Y 1
SFX 613 a ing's a
SFX 916 Y 1
SFX 916 e he's e
SFX 997 Y 1
SFX 997 e xton e
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 a dy a
SFX 704 Y 1
SFX 704 n tte's n
SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460 e gan's e
SFX 475 Y 1
SFX 475 a by's a
SFX 703 Y 1
SFX 703 s tte's s
SFX 557 Y 1
SFX 557 e ngton's e
SFX 727 Y 1
SFX 727 m te's m
SFX 770 Y 1
SFX 770 n rita's n
SFX 967 Y 1
SFX 967 a ca a
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 e or e
SFX 529 Y 1
SFX 529 n rley's n
SFX 619 Y 1
SFX 619 a ika's a
SFX 700 Y 1
SFX 700 n ugh n
SFX 747 Y 1
SFX 747 i sie i
SFX 246 Y 1
SFX 246 i lyn i
SFX 245 Y 1
SFX 245 i lyn's i
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 n sie n
SFX 442 Y 1
SFX 442 a le's a
SFX 194 Y 1
SFX 194 a ena a
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 e le's e
SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121 a ey a
SFX 735 Y 1
SFX 735 e ss's e
SFX 594 Y 1
SFX 594 i le's i
SFX 925 Y 1
SFX 925 d ey d
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 n rry n
SFX 763 Y 1
SFX 763 o rry o
SFX 328 Y 1
SFX 328 n ss's n
SFX 448 Y 1
SFX 448 e io's e
SFX 264 Y 1
SFX 264 a ha a
SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79 a da a
SFX 694 Y 1
SFX 694 t va's t
SFX 562 Y 1
SFX 562 m ndra m
SFX 459 Y 1
SFX 459 e ha e
SFX 90 Y 1
SFX 90 a na's a
SFX 421 Y 1
SFX 421 d na's d
SFX 128 Y 1
SFX 128 e na's e
SFX 896 Y 1
SFX 896 a ison's a
SFX 933 Y 1
SFX 933 a esa a
SFX 830 Y 1
SFX 830 i na's i
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 a ona's a
SFX 643 Y 1
SFX 643 a dell's a
SFX 567 Y 1
SFX 567 l na's l
SFX 203 Y 1
SFX 203 e son's e
SFX 420 Y 1
SFX 420 m na's m
SFX 867 Y 1
SFX 867 i lena i
SFX 512 Y 1
SFX 512 l son's l
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 a ia a
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 a ea a
SFX 511 Y 1
SFX 511 n son's n
SFX 808 Y 1
SFX 808 n ona's n
SFX 771 Y 1
SFX 771 n rita n
SFX 77 Y 1
SFX 77 e ia e
SFX 767 Y 1
SFX 767 n rna n
SFX 739 Y 1
SFX 739 r son's r
SFX 743 Y 1
SFX 743 m 's m
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 n 's n
SFX 921 Y 1
SFX 921 a ger a
SFX 839 Y 1
SFX 839 i maine i
SFX 193 Y 1
SFX 193 a ena's a
SFX 205 Y 1
SFX 205 a ra's a
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 e ra's e
SFX 91 Y 1
SFX 91 a na a
SFX 544 Y 1
SFX 544 a ora's a
SFX 340 Y 1
SFX 340 i ra's i
SFX 423 Y 1
SFX 423 d na d
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 e na e
SFX 690 Y 1
SFX 690 i vin i
SFX 446 Y 1
SFX 446 e isa's e
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 m ra's m
SFX 831 Y 1
SFX 831 i na i
SFX 142 Y 1
SFX 142 n ra's n
SFX 802 Y 1
SFX 802 i ora's i
SFX 568 Y 1
SFX 568 l na l
SFX 422 Y 1
SFX 422 m na m
SFX 638 Y 1
SFX 638 a die's a
SFX 777 Y 1
SFX 777 e rina e
SFX 843 Y 1
SFX 843 i ly i
SFX 889 Y 1
SFX 889 a ka a
SFX 141 Y 1
SFX 141 a sa a
SFX 927 Y 1
SFX 927 a et a
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 e sa e
SFX 862 Y 1
SFX 862 a ler a
SFX 486 Y 1
SFX 486 s ty s
SFX 471 Y 1
SFX 471 a ella a
SFX 729 Y 1
SFX 729 l ter l
SFX 502 Y 1
SFX 502 n ter n
SFX 926 Y 1
SFX 926 a et's a
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 a la a
SFX 115 Y 1
SFX 115 a ta a
SFX 376 Y 1
SFX 376 a el's a
SFX 361 Y 1
SFX 361 e la e
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 e ta e
SFX 897 Y 1
SFX 897 a ison a
SFX 941 Y 1
SFX 941 a elia a
SFX 302 Y 1
SFX 302 i la i
SFX 732 Y 1
SFX 732 l ta l
SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 s ta s
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 i ry i
SFX 401 Y 1
SFX 401 n ry n
SFX 576 Y 1
SFX 576 e ma e
SFX 996 Y 1
SFX 996 e xton's e
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 a ey's a
SFX 434 Y 1
SFX 434 l ma l
SFX 924 Y 1
SFX 924 d ey's d
SFX 778 Y 1
SFX 778 e rie's e
SFX 877 Y 1
SFX 877 i kin's i
SFX 410 Y 1
SFX 410 i rie's i
SFX 592 Y 1
SFX 592 a ley a
SFX 206 Y 1
SFX 206 a ra a
SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 e ley e
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 e ra e
SFX 510 Y 1
SFX 510 n ston n
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 e tt e
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 i ra i
SFX 441 Y 1
SFX 441 i ley i
SFX 832 Y 1
SFX 832 i mie's i
SFX 285 Y 1
SFX 285 m ra m
SFX 143 Y 1
SFX 143 n ra n
SFX 702 Y 1
SFX 702 n tt n
SFX 811 Y 1
SFX 811 a ona a
SFX 545 Y 1
SFX 545 a ora a
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 e io e
SFX 489 Y 1
SFX 489 r tt r
SFX 693 Y 1
SFX 693 t va t
SFX 833 Y 1
SFX 833 i mie i
SFX 803 Y 1
SFX 803 i ora i
SFX 500 Y 1
SFX 500 e th e
SFX 375 Y 1
SFX 375 a etta a
SFX 810 Y 1
SFX 810 n ona n
SFX 940 Y 1
SFX 940 a elia's a
SFX 722 Y 1
SFX 722 n th n
SFX 625 Y 1
SFX 625 e ham's e
SFX 756 Y 1
SFX 756 e se's e
SFX 866 Y 1
SFX 866 i lena's i
SFX 44 Y 1
SFX 44 a ia's a
SFX 519 Y 1
SFX 519 n se's n
SFX 76 Y 1
SFX 76 e ia's e
SFX 483 Y 1
SFX 483 e wood's e
SFX 1000 Y 1
SFX 1000 i wood's i
SFX 928 Y 1
SFX 928 a essa's a
SFX 879 Y 1
SFX 879 i kin i
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 n rt n
SFX 883 Y 1
SFX 883 e ke's e
SFX 604 Y 1
SFX 604 e ko e
SFX 999 Y 1
SFX 999 t wood's t
SFX 484 Y 1
SFX 484 e wood e
SFX 882 Y 1
SFX 882 i ke's i
SFX 998 Y 1
SFX 998 t wood t
SFX 651 Y 1
SFX 651 a ce's a
SFX 555 Y 1
SFX 555 m nisha's m
SFX 384 Y 1
SFX 384 n ttie's n
SFX 575 Y 1
SFX 575 e ma's e
SFX 307 Y 1
SFX 307 a ette's a
SFX 146 Y 1
SFX 146 a ina's a
SFX 428 Y 1
SFX 428 l ma's l
SFX 191 Y 1
SFX 191 e ina's e
SFX 834 Y 1
SFX 834 e mer's e
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 e son e
SFX 768 Y 1
SFX 768 n rlene's n
SFX 571 Y 1
SFX 571 l mer's l
SFX 360 Y 1
SFX 360 e land e
SFX 514 Y 1
SFX 514 l son l
SFX 513 Y 1
SFX 513 n son n
SFX 313 Y 1
SFX 313 a ea's a
SFX 740 Y 1
SFX 740 r son r
SFX 726 Y 1
SFX 726 r tha r
SFX 488 Y 1
SFX 488 e tt's e
SFX 904 Y 1
SFX 904 a ira's a
