src/nlpia/data/words_libre_office_names_us.dic
Aird/1,924
Allard/994
Amee/1,735
Amie/1,2,3,6,7,24,25,128,129,284,286
Ball/1,6,7,166,167,412,413,512,514,571,573
Bean/384
Belt/1,694
Brand/1,2,4,5,12,13,14,15,22,23,28,29,68,69,150,151
Bree/1,8,9,488,492,563,834,835
Britta/207
Bruce/1,916
Burn/1,2,3,6,7,52,53,110,111,509,510,709,712
Butt/1,6,7,22,23,468,469,764,765
Cari/1,2,3,8,9,10,11,34,35,170,171,231,232,245,246,301,302,350,351,353,355,408,409,410,411,414,415,440,441,443,444,521,522,583,584,586,588,676,678,820,821,842,843,866,867
Carl/1,38,54,55,82,83,84,85,150,428,512,514,728,729
Carma/8,9,96,97,146,147,160,161,172,173,376,470,471,940,941,942,943
Carmel/38,39,50,51,82,83
Celia/1,90,243,418
Charis/2,3,170,171,183,184,485,486
Chu/1,8,9,126,127,277,278,559,560,649,650
Claris/1,4,5,170,171,324,326
Crowe/1,213,723
Curr/1,12,14,62,88
Dale/1,12,16,76,213,496
Dame/1,287
Darrel/1,18
David/1,4,5,20,21,421,423
Dawn/1,2,3,4,5,511,513
Dean/1,2,3,4,5,8,9,10,11,16,17,269,270,519,520
Dell/1,4,5,428,434,571,573,731,732
Dena/1,2,3,90,91,138,139,158,159,253,303,304,315,316,322,323,432,433,896,897,898,899,900,901
Doretha/313
Dortha/1,120,313
Elli/1,2,3,6,7,229,230,676,678,794,795,796,797,1000
Elna/1,544
Elvin/1,4,5,142,143
Emmie/488
Fern/1,2,3,14,15,400,401,665,666
France/1,6,7,16,17,94,95,191,192,364,366,368,369
Fred/1,4,5,30,31,32,33,221,222,536,952,953
Gale/1,4,5,8,9,191,192
Garran/1,281,701
Golda/1,56,96,432,613
Hare/1,213,359,483,609,792,822,834,884,922
Henn/1,400,741
Hill/1,6,7,428,434,493,495
Hodge/1,6,7,203,204
Holme/1,6,7,483,484
Hook/1,2,3,46,47,710,713
Hope/1,176,213,483
Horn/1,2,3,46,47,709,712
Hortense/1,76
Howe/1,12,60,94,756,892
Jami/1,20,21,48,49,155,156,832,833
Jose/1,64,80,94,249,883
Judie/499
Jule/1,2,3,6,7,16,17,77,94,95,448,450
Kara/1,8,9,96,120,121,138,139,193,194
Kari/1,2,3,8,10,11,16,17,170,171,231,232,245,246,301,302,353,355,408,409,410,411,414,415,429,435,443,444,521,522,676,678,842,843
Karl/1,428,434
Kasi/1,2,3,746,747
Kathi/1,2,3,245,246,353,355,443,444,533,534,584,586
Kati/1,2,3,4,5,10,11,245,246,719,720
Keir/1,4,5,725,726,749,750
Kenya/72,172,374
Krista/1,8,9,18,19,96,97,138,139,376,377
Lai/1,16,48,559,635
Lara/1,2,3,40,41,158,159,205,206,311,312,894,895
Lashanda/1,205
Lauren/1,2,3,4,5,6,7,98,99,169,704,706
Len/1,4,5,10,11,74,75,82,83,106,107,166,167,342,343,799,801,814,815
Lili/1,4,88,178,179,301,302,440,441,842,843
Lisa/1,140,263,271,307,322,347
Lois/1,2,3,703,705
Lou/1,14,84,104,185,267
Lupe/1,251
Madie/1,203,460
Male/1,10,12,76,213,446,853
Malia/418
Marsh/1,4,5,479,480,711,714
Martin/1,2,3,4,5,169,958,959
Marva/1,253,376,470
Mate/1,203,284,456
Mather/739
Maura/138,158,160,303
Maurice/448
Maxie/575
Meri/1,22,80,231,245,353,521,594,689,719,830
Mila/1,8,9,78,79,243,244,322,323,464,465,589,590,627,628,860,862,894,895
Millie/460,557
Mona/1,120,457,619,748,920,926,948
Mora/1,8,9,120,121,136,137,303,304,322,323,591,592,772,773,812,813,896,897
Myrl/1,2,3,547,548,567,568,731,732
Myrta/56,253,303,442
Nell/1,2,3,4,5,12,13,14,15,512,514
Nevile/1,247
Nicki/1,2,3,594,598
Niki/1,4,5,34,35,876,881
Oliva/1,44,162
Palma/1,162,904
Patria/90,651,964,966
Patten/511
Pete/1,284,776,778
Plume/1,834
Quinn/1,709
Rana/1,2,3,78,79,311,312,315,316,627,628,643,644,645,646
Rebeca/1,888,966
Reda/1,645
Reed/1,421,601
Reid/1,421
Roma/1,8,10,11,40,41,551,554,809,811,940,941
Roth/1,711
Sacha/1,615
Sana/1,78,114,315,544,627,920,948
Sandi/1,2,3,340,341
Santa/10,146
Sau/1,18,347
Seth/1,806
Shara/8,9,96,97,172,173,189,190,303,304,311,312,432,433,619,620
Shari/80,81,443,444,676,678,838,839,1000
Sharri/414
Shea/1,90,189,193,457
Shela/44,189,322,475,591
Shena/90,158,322,619
Shin/1,142,529
Soul/1,728,827
Stone/1,6,7,116,117,623,624,625,626,798,800
Tena/896
Thom/1,20,223,283,790
Thora/475
Tina/1,585,898
Toll/1,571
Tona/1,78,120,307
Tori/1,2,3,408,410,411
Vanna/928,932
Velva/1,926
Vena/1,158,303,374,697,928
Vera/1,78,189,193,585,589,638,643,864
Verona/619
Vina/1,120,158,162,651
Virgie/1,128
Wade/1,625
Wall/1,12,46,68,108,134,493
White/1,213,325,494,609,623,625,822,922
Winn/1,14,108,501,509,808
Wynn/1,2,3,501,502,808,810
